Massachusetts, session 194th, H2655.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 245. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
“Employee”, an individual employed by or contracted for employment by, providing 
health care services at, volunteering at, or participating in an educational course of instruction at 
a health care facility, as defined in this section. 
“Health care employer”, any individual, partnership, association, corporation, trust or any 
person or group of persons operating a health care facility. 
“Health care facility”, a hospital, licensed under section 51, the teaching hospital of the 
University of Massachusetts medical school, a medium-security state correctional facility for 

of 10 12 male inmates located in Plymouth county that is operated and maintained by a private company 
under contract with the department of correction, or any state acute care facility, non-acute care 
facility, continuing care facility and group homes operated, funded or subject to oversight by the 
department of public health, the department of mental health or the department of developmental 
services except a: (i) nursing home; (ii) rest home; (iii) clinic; (iv) mobile or portable clinic; (v) 
mobile or portable clinic satellite; (vi) certified home health agency; (vii) adult day health; (viii) 
hospice; (ix) hospice inpatient satellite; (x) ambulatory surgical center; (xi) renal dialysis; (xii) 
outpatient physical therapy and speech pathology; and (xiii) temporary nursing agency; provided 
that, a facility with more than 1 license or that is licensed to provide multiple services, shall be 
considered a health care facility if the facility is licensed in at least 1 of the included categories. 
“Workplace Violence”, conduct at the work site that is: (i) an unpermitted or harmful 
touching of another person; (ii) an attempt or act to use some degree of physical force on another 
person; or (iii) engaging in conduct that could be reasonably perceived as an intent to touch 
without permission, use immediate physical force or injure a particular person now or in the 
future, that if carried out would constitute a crime, and causes another person to reasonably 
believe that the person has the intent and ability to carry out such conduct.  
(b) Annually, each health care employer shall perform a facility specific risk assessment 
that includes, but is not limited to, the standards determined by the department and in 
consultation with the office of health equity. The facility specific risk assessment shall be done in 
cooperation with the employees of the health care employer and any labor organization or 
organizations representing the employees, examining all factors, which may put any of the 
employees at risk of workplace violence. The factors shall include, but not be limited to: (i) 
working in public settings; (ii) guarding or maintaining property or possessions; (iii) working in 

of 10 35 high-crime areas; (iv) working late night or early morning hours; (v) working alone or in small 
numbers; (vi) uncontrolled public access to the workplace; (vii) working in public areas where 
people are in crisis; (viii) working in areas where a patient or resident may exhibit violent 
behavior; (ix) working in areas with known security problems; and (x) working with insufficient 
qualified staff in 1 or more position titles to address foreseeable risk factors. 
(c) Based on the findings of the risk assessment in subsection (b), the health care 
employer shall develop and implement a program to minimize the danger of workplace violence 
to employees, which shall include appropriate employee training, and a system for the ongoing 
reporting and monitoring of incidents and situations involving violence or the risk of violence. 
Employee training shall include, in addition to all employer training program policies, methods 
of reporting to appropriate public safety officials, bodies or agencies and processes necessary for 
the filing of criminal charges. 
(d) Each health care employer shall develop a written violence prevention plan setting 
forth the employer’s workplace violence prevention plan. The health care employer shall make 
the plan available to each employee and provide the health care facility plan to any of its 
employees upon written request. The health care employer shall provide upon written request the 
health care facility plan to any labor organization or organizations representing any of its 
employees. The plan shall include but not be limited to: (i) a list of those factors and 
circumstances that may pose a danger to employees; (ii) a description of the methods that the 
health care employer will use to alleviate hazards associated with each factor; including, but not 
limited to, employee training and any appropriate changes in job design, staffing, security, 
equipment or facilities; (iii) a post-incident debriefing process with affected staff; and (iv) a 
description of the reporting and monitoring system. 

of 10 58  (e) Each health care employer shall designate a senior manager responsible for the 
development and support of an in-house crisis response team for employee-victims of workplace 
violence. Said team shall implement an assaulted staff action program that includes, but is not 
limited to, group crisis interventions, individual crisis counseling, staff victims’ support groups, 
employee victims’ family crisis intervention, peer-help and professional referrals. 
(f) Any health care employer who violates any rule, regulation or requirement made by 
the department under authority hereof may, based on the reason for the violation and the 
discretion of the department, be punished by a fine of not more than $2,000 for each offense. The 
department or its representative or any aggrieved employee, any interested party or any officer of 
any labor union or association, whether incorporated or otherwise, may file a written complaint 
with the district court in the jurisdiction of which the violation occurs and shall promptly notify 
the attorney general in writing of such complaint. The attorney general, upon determination that 
there is a violation of any workplace standard relative to the protection of the occupational health 
and safety of employees or of any standard of requirement of licensure, may order any work site 
to be closed by way of the issuance of a cease and desist order enforceable in the appropriate 
courts of the commonwealth. 
(g) No employee shall be penalized by a health care employer in any way as a result of 
such employee’s filing of a complaint or otherwise providing notice to the department in regard 
to the occupational health and safety of such employee or their fellow employees exposed to 
workplace violence risk factors. 
(h) Each health care employer shall submit a report annually, on a form prescribed by the 
commissioner of the department, of all incidents of workplace violence reported to the health 

of 10 80 care employer that occurred at the health care facility on an employee, an emergency medical 
technician, an ambulance operator or an ambulance attendant. The report shall be submitted to 
the department and the office of the district attorney for the county where the health care facility 
is located. Not more than 90 days after receiving the reports, the department shall make the 
aggregate data statewide and by county publicly available; provided that the department 
categorize the aggregate data by occupation and incident type. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 52E the following section:- 
Section 52F. (a) For purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the 
context clearly indicates otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
“Employee”, an individual employed by a health care employer. 
“Health care employer”, any individual, partnership, association, corporation or, trust or 
any person or group of persons operating a health care facility. 
“Health care facility”, a hospital, licensed under section 51, the teaching hospital of the 
University of Massachusetts medical school, a medium-security state correctional facility for 
male inmates located in Plymouth county that is operated and maintained by a private company 
under contract with the department of correction, or any state acute care facility, non-acute care 
facility, continuing care facility and group homes operated, funded or subject to oversight by the 
department of public health, the department of mental health or the department of developmental 
services except a: (i) nursing home; (ii) rest home; (iii) clinic; (iv) mobile or portable clinic; (v) 
100 mobile or portable clinic satellite; (vi) certified home health agency; (vii) adult day health; (viii) 
101 hospice; (ix) hospice inpatient satellite; (x) ambulatory surgical center; (xi) renal dialysis; (xii) 

of 10 102 outpatient physical therapy and speech pathology; and (xiii) temporary nursing agency; provided 
103 that, a facility with more than 1 license or that is licensed to provide multiple services, shall be 
104 considered a health care facility if the facility is licensed in at least 1 of the included categories. 
105  (b) A health care facility shall permit an employee to take paid leave from work if: (i) the 
106 employee is a victim of assault or assault and battery as defined under section 13I of chapter 265 
107 which occurred in the line of duty and; (ii) the employee uses the leave to seek or obtain victim 
108 services or legal assistance, obtain a protective order from a court, appear in court or before a 
109 grand jury, or meet with a district attorney or other law enforcement official. 
110  (c) An employee seeking leave under this section shall not have to use annual leave, 
111 vacation leave, personal leave or sick leave available to the employee, prior to requesting or 
112 taking leave under this section. (d) A health care employer may require an employee to provide 
113 documentation evidencing that the employee is a victim of assault or assault and battery 
114 sustained in the line of duty and that the leave taken is consistent with the conditions of 
115 subsection (b). An employee shall provide such documentation to the health care employer 
116 within 5 business days after the health care employer requests documentation relative to the 
117 employee’s absence. 
118  (e) An employee seeking leave from work pursuant to subsection (b) shall provide 
119 advance notice of the leave to the employer in accordance with the employer's leave policy; 
120 provided, however, that if an employee is absent on an unauthorized basis, the health care 
121 employer shall not take any negative action against the employee if the employee, within 30 days 
122 from the unauthorized absence or within 30 days from the last unauthorized absence in the 

of 10 123 instance of consecutive days of unauthorized absences, provides documentation that the 
124 unauthorized absence meets the criteria of subsection (b). 
125  (f) All information related to the employee's leave taken pursuant to this section shall be 
126 kept confidential by the health care employer and shall not be disclosed, except to the extent that 
127 disclosure is: (i) requested or consented to, in writing, by the employee; (ii) ordered to be 
128 released by a court of competent jurisdiction; (iii) required by federal or state law; (iv) required 
129 in the course of an investigation authorized by law enforcement, including, but not limited to, an 
130 investigation by the attorney general; or (v) necessary to protect the safety of the employee or 
131 others employed at the workplace. 
132  (g) No health care employer shall require an employee to exhaust all annual leave, 
133 vacation leave, personal leave or sick leave available to the employee prior to requesting or 
134 taking leave under this section. 
135  (h) No health care employer shall coerce, interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of, 
136 or any attempt to exercise, any rights provided by this section or to make leave requested or 
137 taken hereunder contingent upon whether or not the victim maintains contact with the alleged 
138 abuser. 
139  (i) No health care employer shall discharge or in any other manner discriminate against 
140 an employee for exercising the employee’s rights under this section. An employee who takes 
141 leave under this section shall not lose any employment benefit accrued prior to the date on which 
142 the leave taken under this section commenced as a result of taking said leave. Upon the 
143 employee’s return from said leave, the employee shall be entitled to restoration to the 
144 employee’s original job or to an equivalent position. 

of 10 145  (j) Each health care employer shall post in a conspicuous place within the health care 
146 facility a notice prepared by the department indicating the rights and responsibilities provided by 
147 this section. The notice shall be issued in English, Spanish, Chinese, Haitian Creole, Italian, 
148 Portuguese, Vietnamese, Laotian, Khmer, Russian and any other language that is the primary 
149 language of at least 10,000 or ½ of one per cent of all residents of the commonwealth. The 
150 required workplace notice shall be in English and each language other than English which is the 
151 primary language of 5 or more employees or self-employed individuals of that workplace, if such 
152 notice is available from the department. Each health care employer shall notify each employee 
153 not more than 30 days from the beginning date of the employee’s employment, the rights and 
154 responsibilities provided by this section, including those related to notification requirements and 
155 confidentiality. 
156  (k) This section shall not be construed to exempt an employer from complying with 
157 chapter 258B, section 14B of chapter 268 or any other general or special law or to limit the rights 
158 of any employee under said chapter 258B, said section 14B of chapter 268 or any other general 
159 or special law. 
160  SECTION 3. Section 13I of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
161 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraphs:- 
162  Whoever knowingly and intentionally commits an assault or an assault and battery on an 
163 employee, as defined in section 245 of chapter 111, while in the line of duty, shall be punished 
164 by imprisonment in state prison for not more than five years or imprisonment in a jail or house of 
165 correction for not less than 90 days nor more than 2 and one-half years or by a fine of not less 
166 than $500 nor more than $5,000, or any combination of said fines and imprisonment. 

of 10 167  Any emergency medical technician, ambulance operator, ambulance attendant or a health 
168 care provider as defined in section 245 of chapter 111, who is the victim of assault or assault and 
169 battery at a health care facility, as such term is defined in said section 245, in the line of duty 
170 shall be given the option of providing the address of the health care facility where the assault or 
171 assault and battery occurred or of the labor organization in which they are a member in good 
172 standing. In instances where the address of the health care facility is used or labor organization to 
173 which the employee is a member in good standing, the health care facility or labor organization 
174 shall ensure that the individual receives any documents pertaining to the assault or assault and 
175 battery within 24 hours of receipt by the health care facility or labor organization. The health 
176 care facility or labor organization shall demonstrate that it has provided any and all 
177 documentation by obtaining a signature from the individual acknowledging receipt. 
178  SECTION 4. Section 13I of Chapter 265 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 
179 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the words "treating or transporting 
180 a person". 
181  SECTION 5. The commissioner of public health shall adopt rules and regulations within 
182 180 days of enactment of this act necessary to implement and enforce the purposes of section 
183 245 of chapter 111 of the General Laws. 
184  SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the 
185 contrary, within twelve months of the date of enactment, the executive office of health and 
186 human services shall coordinate with the executive office of public safety and security to issue a 
187 report and recommendations to improve data sharing, communication, and collaboration between 
188 health care facilities, as defined by section 51 of chapter 111 of the general laws, and public 

of 10 189 safety and law enforcement entities. The regulations shall include but not be limited to: allowing 
190 health care facilities to access reports on individuals maintained by agencies within each 
191 department of the  executive office of health and human services, and public safety and law 
192 enforcement officials through a secure electronic medical record, health information exchange, 
193 or other similar software or information systems connected to health care facilities, for the 
194 purposes of improving ease of access and utilization of such data for treatment and diagnosis, 
195 and supporting integration of such data within a patient’s electronic health record for purposes of 
196 treatment of diagnosis; expansion of safe and appropriate state-operated alternative placement 
197 options for patients presenting in health care facilities in acute mental health or behavioral health 
198 crisis and for whom all reasonable clinical interventions have been unsuccessful, and other 
199 alternatives, such as transfer to a more secure hospital, are unavailable, and; identifying and 
200 establishing new pathways to enter patients into the Department of Mental Health continuing 
201 care system or similar treatment  that do not require an arrest.